Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.505

Law student rural public prosecution program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall administer a law student rural public prosecution program, or contract with a statewide entity which represents prosecuting attorneys to run the program. The program shall coordinate with one or more law schools to place law students who are eligible to practice as a licensed legal intern under Washington state admission and practice rule 9 and/or recent law school graduates as legal interns with prosecuting attorneys located in underserved areas and rural areas of the state. The program must allow the intern to gain real-world prosecution experience under the mentorship of the experienced prosecuting attorney or their deputy, including active litigation opportunities, with the purpose of encouraging the intern to consider, or not be deterred from pursuing, employment opportunities in prosecution in underserved areas and rural areas of Washington state. The internship may be structured to correspond with time periods relevant to the academic calendar.

(2) Contracts established under this section shall include monthly compensation and housing stipends for program participants. Contracts may include partial reimbursement for the supervising attorney.

[ 2024 c 293 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 293: See note following RCW 2.70.120.